Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-13] Disclosure of other digital
assets held in trust when trustee not original user. Unless otherwise
ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a trust, a custodian
shall disclose, to a trustee that is not an original user of an account, a
catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by an original or
successor user and stored, carried, or maintained by the custodian in an
account of the trust and any digital assets, other than the content of
electronic communications, in which the trust has a right or interest if the
trustee gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or
electronic form;

(2) A certified copy of the trust instrument;

(3) A certification by the trustee, under penalty of
perjury, that the trust exists and the trustee is a currently acting trustee of
the trust; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the trust's account; or

(B) Evidence linking the account to the
trust. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next